Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 9. Duties and Powers of the Department.

Sec. 06.60.850.
Publication of disciplinary action.

The department may release, through the Internet, the registry, or other publication, notice of disciplinary action taken by the department against a person required to be licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 78 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.860.
Authority of department.

The department may make a ruling, demand, or finding that the department determines is necessary for the proper conduct of a licensee’s business regulated by this chapter or for the enforcement of this chapter, including an order for the payment of restitution. The ruling, demand, or finding must be consistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.870.
Authority to participate in national system and registry. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]